Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1306
Registration; record; contents; fee.

(1) A retirement subdivision or community may be registered by filing with the agency a statement of record containing the following documents and information:

(a) An acknowledgment that the developer shall be amenable to process issued by any court of this state in any noncriminal proceeding arising under the provisions of sections 76-1301 to 76-1315 against the developer;

(b) A legal description of the lands offered for registration as a retirement subdivision or community, together with a map showing the subdivision proposed or made, and the dimensions of the lots, parcels, units, or interests and the relation of such lands to existing streets, roads, and other improvements;

(c) The states or jurisdictions, including the federal government, in which an application for registration or similar document has been filed, and any adverse order, judgment, or decree entered in connection with the retirement subdivision or community lands by the regulatory authorities in each jurisdiction or by any court;

(d) The developer's name, address, and the form, date, and jurisdiction of organization; and the address of each of its offices in this state;

(e) The name, address, and principal occupation for the last five years of every director and officer of the developer or person occupying a similar status, performing similar functions, or having an interest in the retirement subdivision or community lands and the extent and nature of his or her interest in the developer or the retirement subdivision or community lands as of a specified date within thirty days of the filing of the application;

(f) A statement, in a form acceptable to the agency, of the condition of the title to the retirement subdivision or community lands including encumbrances as of a specified date within thirty days of the date of application by a title opinion of a licensed attorney, not a salaried employee, officer, or director of the developer, or by other evidence of title acceptable to the agency;

(g) Copies of the instruments which will be delivered to a purchaser to evidence his or her interest in the retirement subdivision or community lands and of the contracts and other agreements which a purchaser will be required to agree to or sign;

(h) Copies of the instruments by which the interest in the retirement subdivision or community lands was acquired and a statement of any lien or encumbrance upon the title and copies of the instruments creating the lien or encumbrance, if any, with data as to recording;

(i) If there is a lien or encumbrance affecting more than one lot, parcel, unit, or interest, a statement of the consequences for a purchaser of failure to discharge the lien or encumbrance and the steps, if any, taken to protect the purchaser in case of this eventuality;

(j) Copies of instruments creating easements, restrictions, or other encumbrances affecting the retirement subdivision or community lands;

(k) A statement of the zoning and other governmental regulations affecting the use of the retirement subdivision or community lands and also of any existing taxes and existing or proposed special taxes or assessments which affect such lands;

(l) The proposed public-offering statement;

(m) Current audited financial statements of the developer and, if different, of any association. If the developer or association has been in existence for less than one year at the date of application it may provide prospective financial statements, compiled by a certified public accountant under generally accepted accounting standards, unless an examined statement is required under subdivision (1)(n) of this section;

(n) Upon initial registration or an amendment expanding a retirement subdivision or community, prospective financial statements examined by a certified public accountant in accordance with generally accepted standards for an examination of a forecast. Examined prospective financial statements shall not be required of a developer of a retirement subdivision or community if (i) all payments by purchasers are held in escrow at a state or federally regulated financial institution located within this state until closing of the disposition, (ii) all public improvements serving the units or lots are completed prior to disposition, and (iii) the interests in a unit or lot of a purchaser who is not in default on the contract for disposition will upon disposition be free of or not subject to disturbance by any encumbrances incurred by the developer or association for purchase or improvement of the retirement subdivision or community;

(o) Upon initial registration or an amendment expanding a retirement subdivision or community which offers a promise to provide nursing or health-related services to purchasers in the future pursuant to contracts effective for the life of the purchaser or a period in excess of one year in consideration for an entrance fee, an actuarial forecast in a form satisfactory to the agency, which identifies the qualifications of the actuary or actuaries preparing the forecast;

(p) Information concerning any adjudication of bankruptcy against the developer, the association, the managing agent, or any principal owning more than ten percent of the interests in the retirement subdivision or community, developer, association, or managing agent at the time of filing; and

(q) Any other information which the agency by its rules requires for the protection of purchasers.

(2) At the time of filing a statement of record, or any amendment thereto, the developer shall pay to the agency a fee, not in excess of two hundred dollars, in accordance with a schedule to be fixed by the regulations of the agency, which fees may be used by the agency to defray part of the cost of rendering services under sections 76-1301 to 76-1315.

(3) The filing with the agency of a statement of record, or of an amendment thereto, shall be deemed to have taken place upon the receipt thereof, accompanied by payment of the fee required by subsection (2) of this section.

(4) The information contained in or filed with any statement of record shall be made available to the public under such regulations as the agency may prescribe and copies thereof shall be furnished to anyone requesting them at such reasonable charge as the agency may prescribe.

(5) If the developer registers additional retirement subdivision or community lands, he or she may consolidate the subsequent registration with any earlier registration offering such lands for disposition under the same promotional plan.

(6) The developer, association, and managing agent shall immediately report to the agency any additional liens, adjudication of bankruptcy against the developer, the association, the managing agent, or any principal owning more than ten percent of the interests in the retirement subdivision or community, developer, association, or managing agent, and any action or development which materially changes the condition of the title to the retirement subdivision or community lands or to the disclosures in the statement of record, including the public-offering statement.

(7) Nothing in sections 76-1301 to 76-1315 shall require retirement subdivisions or community lands in existence on August 31, 2003, to prepare audited financial statements from the date of their inception, but such audited financial statements for the most recent fiscal year ending before August 31, 2003, shall be filed as otherwise required by the terms of sections 76-1301 to 76-1315.

Laws 1972, LB 1311, § 6;

Laws 1983, LB 447, § 88;

Laws 2003, LB 61, § 5.